North Dakota, session 69, HB1180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15-10-18.2 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. "Dependent" for purposes of section 15-10-18.3 means:
a. A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a resident veteran, as "veteran" is
defined in section 37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other
service-connected causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as
determined by the department of veterans' affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to
include individual unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability
rating toveteran being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the
department of veterans' affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner
of war, or was declared missing in action;
b. A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran, as defined in section
37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected
causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the
department of veterans' affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to include individual
unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability rating toveteran
being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the department of veterans'
affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared
missing in action, provided the spouse, widow, or widower, or the child's or stepchild's
other parent, has been a resident of this state and was a resident of this state at the time
of death or determination of total disability of the veteran;
c. A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran, as defined in section
37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected
causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the
department of veterans' affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to include individual
unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability rating toveteran
being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the department of veterans'
affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared
missing in action, provided the spouse, widow, or widower, or the child's or stepchild's
other parent, establishes residency in this state and maintains that residency for a period
of five years immediately preceding the spouse's, widow's, widower's, child's, or
stepchild's enrollment at an institution under the control of the state board of higher
education; or
d. A widow or widower of a veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, who is receiving United
States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation and
satisfies the residency requirement in subdivision a, b, or c. For purposes of this
subdivision, sufficient proof of receipt of United States department of veterans affairs

H. B. NO. 1180 - PAGE 2
dependency and indemnity compensation includes correspondence directed to a
qualifying veteran's widow or widower by the United States department of veterans
affairs which indicates the widow or widower is a survivor of the qualifying veteran and is
in receipt of United States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity
compensation.
For purposes of this subsection, if the determination of disability or service-connected death
occurs subsequent to the qualifying veteran's death through application of a law that renders a
surviving spouse of a qualifying veteran eligible for United States department of veterans'
affairs disability and indemnity compensation, the determination for purposes of qualification
as a dependent under this subsection is presumed to precede the veteran's death.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 37-19.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The spouse of a disabled veteran, who has a one hundred percent service-connected
disability as determined by the department of veterans' affairs, or who has an extra-schedular
rating to include individual unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total
disability rating toveteran being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the
department of veterans' affairs, is, if the disabled veteran is unable to exercise the veteran's
right to a veteran's employment preference due to the veteran's disability, entitled, if the
person is otherwise qualified, to the employment preference given to a veteran under section
37-19.1-02 in the manner provided therein.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
j. Motor vehicles not exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms]
registered gross weight owned and operated by a disabled veteran under the provisions
of Public Law 79-663 [38 U.S.C. 3901], a disabled veteran who has a one hundred
percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans' affairs,
or a disabled veteran who has an extra-schedular rating to include individual
unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability rating toveteran
being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the department of veterans'
affairs is entitled to display either a distinctive license plate or a standard plate that does
not identify the veteran as a veteran or disabled veteran which is issued by the
department at no cost to the qualifying veteran or surviving spouse or any other
distinctive or vanity plate purchased from the department by the qualifying veteran or
surviving spouse. This exemption applies to no more than two such motor vehicles
owned by a disabled veteran at any one time. A surviving spouse of a disabled veteran
who is receiving United States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity
compensation is eligible for the exemption under this subdivision for one vehicle. If the
determination of disability or service-connected death occurs subsequent to the
qualifying veteran's death through application of a law that renders a surviving spouse of
a qualifying veteran eligible for United States department of veterans affairs disability and
indemnity compensation, the determination for purposes of the exemption under this
subdivision is presumed to precede the veteran's death. Sufficient proof of receipt of
United States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation
includes correspondence directed to a surviving spouse of a qualifying veteran by the
United States department of veterans affairs which indicates the surviving spouse is a
survivor of the qualifying veteran and is in receipt of United States department of
veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-02-08.8 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1180 - PAGE 3
1. A disabled veteran of the United States armed forces with an armed forces service-connected
disability of fifty percent or greater or a disabled veteran who has an extra-schedular rating to
include individual unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability rating
toveteran being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the department of
veterans' affairs, who was discharged under honorable conditions or who has been retired
from the armed forces of the United States, or the surviving spouse if the disabled veteran is
deceased, is eligible for a credit applied against the first eight thousand one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of the homestead owned and occupied by the disabled veteran or surviving
spouse equal to the percentage of the disabled veteran's disability compensation rating for
service-connected disabilities as certified by the department of veterans' affairs for the
purpose of applying for a property tax credit. A surviving spouse who is receiving United
States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation receives a
one hundred percent credit as described in this subsection. If the determination of disability or
service-connected death occurs subsequent to the qualifying veteran's death through
application of a law that renders a surviving spouse of a qualifying veteran eligible for United
States department of veterans affairs disability and indemnity compensation, the
determination for purposes of the credit under this subsection is presumed to precede the
veteran's death. Sufficient proof of receipt of United States department of veterans affairs
dependency and indemnity compensation includes correspondence directed to a surviving
spouse of a qualifying veteran by the United States department of veterans affairs which
indicates the surviving spouse is a survivor of the qualifying veteran and is in receipt of United
States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-40.3-04 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Any motor vehicle acquired by, or leased and in the possession of, a resident disabled veteran
under the provisions of Pub. L. 79-663 [38 U.S.C. 3901], a resident disabled veteran who has
a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of
veterans' affairs, or a resident disabled veteran who has an extra-schedular rating to include
individual unemployability that bringswhich results in the veteran's total disability rating
toveteran being paid at the one hundred percent rate as determined by the department of
veterans' affairs who registers, or is eligible to register, the vehicle with a distinctive license
plate issued by the department of transportation under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section
39-04-18. A surviving spouse who is receiving United States department of veterans affairs
dependency and indemnity compensation is eligible for the exemption in this subsection. If the
determination of disability or service-connected death occurs subsequent to the qualifying
veteran's death through application of a law that renders a surviving spouse of a qualifying
veteran eligible for United States department of veterans affairs disability and indemnity
compensation, the determination for purposes of the exemption under this subsection is
presumed to precede the veteran's death. Sufficient proof of receipt of United States
department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation includes
correspondence directed to a surviving spouse of a qualifying veteran by the United States
department of veterans affairs which indicates the surviving spouse is a survivor of the
qualifying veteran and is in receipt of United States department of veterans affairs
dependency and indemnity compensation.
SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 4 of this Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024. Section 5 of this Act is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2025.

H. B. NO. 1180 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1180.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State